California statutes. Business and Professions Code
 (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), or (8) of subdivision (a) by a licensee or a person subject to be licensed under this chapter, or by their agent or salesperson, is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(1) An indictment or information against a person who is not licensed but who is required to be licensed under this chapter shall be brought, or a criminal complaint filed, for a violation of this section, in accordance with paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 802 of the Penal Code, within four years from the date of the contract or, if the contract is not reduced to writing, from the date the buyer makes the first payment to the contractor.

(2) An indictment or information against a person who is
 licensed under this chapter shall be brought, or a criminal complaint filed, for a violation of this section, in accordance with paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 802 of the Penal Code, within two years from the date of the contract or, if the contract is not reduced to writing, from the date the buyer makes the first payment to the contractor.

(3) The limitations on actions in this subdivision do not apply to any administrative action filed against a licensed contractor.

(c) (1) Any person who violates this section as part of a plan or scheme to defraud an owner or tenant of a residential or nonresidential structure, including a mobilehome or manufactured home, in connection with the offer or performance of repairs to the structure for damage caused by a natural disaster, shall be ordered by the court to make full restitution to the victim based on
 the person’s ability to pay, defined as the overall capability of the defendant to reimburse the costs, or a portion of the costs, including consideration of, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) The defendant’s present financial position.

(B) The defendant’s reasonably discernible future financial position, provided that the court shall not consider a period of more than one year from the date of the hearing for purposes of determining the reasonably discernible future financial position of the defendant.

(C) The likelihood that the defendant will be able to obtain employment within one year from the date of the hearing.

(D) Any other factor that may bear upon the defendant’s financial capability to reimburse the county for costs.

(2) In addition to full restitution, and imprisonment authorized by this section, the court may impose a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), based upon the defendant’s ability to pay. This subdivision applies to natural disasters for which a state of emergency is proclaimed by the Governor pursuant to Section 8625 of the Government Code, or for which an emergency or major disaster is declared by the President of the United States.

(d) This section shall become operative July 1, 2021.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 7) and added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 92, Sec. 8.   (AB 1869)   Effective September 18, 2020.   Operative July 1, 2021, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7160.

Any person who is induced to contract for a work of improvement, including but not limited to a home improvement, in reliance on false or fraudulent representations or false statements knowingly made, may sue and recover from such contractor or solicitor a penalty of five hundred dollars ($500), plus reasonable attorney’s fees, in addition to any damages sustained by him by reason of such statements or representations made by the contractor or solicitor.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 7028.2 by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1138.)
-------------------------------------------

7161.

It is a misdemeanor for any person to engage in any of the following acts, the commission of which is cause for disciplinary action against any licensee or applicant:

(a) Using false, misleading, or deceptive advertising as an inducement to enter into any contract for a work of improvement, including, but not limited to, any home improvement contract, whereby any member of the public may be misled or injured.

(b) Making any substantial misrepresentation in the procurement of a contract for a home improvement or other work of improvement or making any false promise of a character likely to influence, persuade, or induce any person to enter into the contract.

(c) Any fraud in the execution of, or in the material alteration of, any contract, trust deed, mortgage, promissory note, or other document incident to a home improvement transaction or other transaction involving a work of improvement.

(d) Preparing or accepting any trust deed, mortgage, promissory note, or other evidence of indebtedness upon the obligations of a home improvement transaction or other transaction for a work of improvement with knowledge that it specifies a greater monetary obligation than the consideration for the improvement work, which consideration may be a time sale price.

(e) Directly or indirectly publishing any advertisement relating to home improvements or other works of improvement that contains an assertion, representation, or statement of fact that is false, deceptive, or misleading, or by any
 means advertising or purporting to offer to the general public this improvement work with the intent not to accept contracts for the particular work or at the price that is advertised or offered to the public, except that any advertisement that is subject to and complies with the existing rules, regulations, or guides of the Federal Trade Commission shall not be deemed false, deceptive, or misleading.

(f) (1) Any person who violates subdivision (b), (c), (d), or (e) as part of a plan or scheme to defraud an owner of a residential or nonresidential structure, including a mobilehome or manufactured home, in connection with the offer or performance of repairs to the structure for damage caused by a natural disaster, shall be ordered by the court to make full restitution to the victim based on the person’s ability to pay, defined as the overall capability of the defendant to reimburse the costs, or a portion of the costs,
 including consideration of, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) The defendant’s present financial position.

(B) The defendant’s reasonably discernible future financial position, provided that the court shall not consider a period of more than one year from the date of the hearing for purposes of determining the reasonably discernible future financial position of the defendant.

(C) The likelihood that the defendant will be able to obtain employment within one year from the date of the hearing.

(D) Any other factor that may bear upon the defendant’s financial capability to reimburse the county for costs.

(2) In addition to full restitution and imprisonment as authorized by this
 section, the court may impose a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), based upon the defendant’s ability to pay. This subdivision applies to natural disasters for which a state of emergency is proclaimed by the Governor pursuant to Section 8625 of the Government Code or for which an emergency or major disaster is declared by the President of the United States.

(g) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2021.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 9) and added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 92, Sec. 10.   (AB 1869)   Effective September 18, 2020.   Operative July 1, 2021, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7162.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any representation by a person licensed pursuant to this chapter with respect to a trademark or brand name, quality, or size of any goods or materials, in reference to bathroom fixtures, a sink, stove, refrigerator, lighting, carpeting and other floor surfaces, burglar and smoke alarms, a solar energy system, paints, textured coatings, siding and other wall surfaces, insulation, roofing, air conditioning and heating systems, and appliances, to be provided by the person pursuant to a home improvement contract, as defined in Section 7151.2, shall set forth, in writing, in the contract or specifications and shall include a description
 of the goods or materials, including any brand name, model number, or similar designation.

(b) Failure to install the specific goods or materials as represented as required by this section constitutes a cause for disciplinary action under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 249, Sec. 5.   (SB 757)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7163.

(a) No contract for home improvement shall be enforceable against the buyer if the obtaining of a loan for all or a portion of the contract price is a condition precedent to the contract or if the contractor provides financing, or in any manner assists the buyer to obtain a loan or refers the buyer to any person who may loan or arrange a loan for all or a portion of the contract price unless all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) The third party, if any, agrees to
 make the loan. 

(2) The buyer agrees to accept the loan or financing. 

(3) The buyer does not rescind the loan or financing transaction, within the period prescribed for rescission, pursuant to the federal Truth in Lending Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 et seq.) or Regulation Z, if applicable.

(b) Until the requirements of paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subdivision (a) are satisfied, it shall be unlawful for the contractor to do any of the following:

(1) Deliver any property or perform any services other than obtaining building permits or other similar services preliminary to the commencement of the home improvement for which no mechanic’s lien can be claimed. 

(2) Represent in any manner that
 the contract is enforceable or that the buyer has any obligation thereunder. 

Any violation of this subdivision shall render the contract unenforceable.

(c) If the contract is unenforceable pursuant to subdivision (a) or subdivision (b), the contractor shall immediately and without condition return all money, property, and other consideration given by the buyer. If the buyer gave any property as consideration and the contractor does not or cannot return it for whatever reason, the contractor shall immediately return the fair market value of the property or its value as designated in the contract, whichever is greater. Nothing herein shall prohibit a contractor from receiving a downpayment otherwise permitted by law provided the contractor returns the downpayment as herein required if the contract is unenforceable pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b). 

(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the buyer may retain without obligation in law or equity any services or property provided pursuant to a contract that is unenforceable pursuant to subdivision (a) or subdivision (b).

(2) If the contractor has delivered any property to the buyer pursuant to a contract which is unenforceable pursuant to subdivision (a) or subdivision (b), the buyer shall make the property available to the contractor for return provided that all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(A) The property can be practically returned to the contractor without causing any damage to the buyer. 

(B) The contractor, at the contractor’s expense, first returns to the buyer any money, property, and other consideration taken by the contractor provided that the
 property is returned in the condition that it was in immediately prior to its taking. If applicable, the contractor shall also, at its expense, reinstall any property taken in the manner in which the property had been installed prior to its taking. 

(C) The contractor, at the contractor’s expense, picks up the property within 60 days of the execution of the contract. 

(e) For the purpose of this section, “home improvement” means “home improvement” as defined in Section 7151. Goods are included within the definition notwithstanding whether they are to be attached to real property or to be so affixed to real property as to become a part thereof whether or not severable therefrom. 

(f) The rights and remedies provided the buyer under this section are nonexclusive and cumulative to all other rights and remedies under
 other laws.

(g) Any waiver of this section shall be deemed contrary to public policy and shall be void and unenforceable. However, the buyer may waive subdivisions (a) and (b) to the extent that the contract is executed in connection with the making of emergency repairs or services that are necessary for the immediate protection of persons or real or personal property. The buyer’s waiver for emergency repairs or services shall be in a dated written statement that describes the emergency, states that the contractor has informed the buyer of subdivisions (a) and (b) and that the buyer waives those provisions, and is signed by each owner of the property. Waivers made on printed forms are void and unenforceable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 589, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7164.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 7044, every contract and any changes in a contract, between an owner and a contractor, for the construction of a single-family dwelling to be retained by the owner for at least one year shall be evidenced in writing signed by both parties.

(b) The writing shall contain the following:

(1) The name, address, and license number of the contractor.

(2) The approximate dates when the work will begin and be substantially completed.

(3) A legal description of the location where the work will be done.

(4) A statement with the heading “Mechanics Lien Warning” as follows:

“MECHANICS LIEN WARNING:

Anyone who helps improve your property, but who is not paid, may record what is called a mechanics lien on your property. A mechanics lien is a claim, like a mortgage or home equity loan, made against your property and recorded with the county recorder.

Even if you pay your contractor in full, unpaid subcontractors, suppliers, and laborers who helped to improve your property may record mechanics liens and sue you in court to foreclose the lien. If a court finds the lien is valid, you could be forced to pay twice or have a court officer sell your home to pay the lien. Liens can also
 affect your credit.

To preserve their right to record a lien, each subcontractor and material supplier must provide you with a document called a ‘Preliminary Notice.’ This notice is not a lien. The purpose of the notice is to let you know that the person who sends you the notice has the right to record a lien on your property if he or she is not paid.

BE CAREFUL. The Preliminary Notice can be sent up to 20 days after the subcontractor starts work or the supplier provides material. This can be a big problem if you pay your contractor before you have received the Preliminary Notices.

You will not get Preliminary Notices from your prime contractor or other persons you contract with directly or from laborers who work on your project. The law assumes that you already know they are improving your property.

PROTECT YOURSELF
 FROM LIENS. You can protect yourself from liens by getting a list from your contractor of all the subcontractors and material suppliers that work on your project. Find out from your contractor when these subcontractors started work and when these suppliers delivered goods or materials. Then wait 20 days, paying attention to the Preliminary Notices you receive.

PAY WITH JOINT CHECKS. One way to protect yourself is to pay with a joint check. When your contractor tells you it is time to pay for the work of a subcontractor or supplier who has provided you with a Preliminary Notice, write a joint check payable to both the contractor and the subcontractor or material supplier.

For other ways to prevent liens, visit CSLB’s Web site at www.cslb.ca.gov or call CSLB at 800-321-CSLB (2752).

REMEMBER, IF YOU DO NOTHING, YOU RISK HAVING A LIEN
 PLACED ON YOUR HOME. This can mean that you may have to pay twice, or face the forced sale of your home to pay what you owe.”

(5) (A) A statement prepared by the board through regulation that emphasizes the value of commercial general liability insurance and encourages the owner to verify the contractor’s insurance coverage and status.

(B) A check box indicating whether or not the contractor carries commercial general liability insurance, and if that is the case, the name and the telephone number of the insurer.

(c) The writing may also contain other matters agreed to by the parties to the contract. The writing shall be legible and shall clearly describe any other document which is to be incorporated into the contract. Prior to commencement of any work, the owner
 shall be furnished a copy of the written agreement, signed by the contractor. The provisions of this section are not exclusive and do not relieve the contractor from compliance with all other applicable provisions of law.

(d) Every contract subject to the provisions of this section shall contain, in close proximity to the signatures of the owner and contractor, a notice in at least 10-point boldface type or in all capital letters, stating that the owner has the right to require the contractor to have a performance and payment bond and that the expense of the bond may be borne by the owner.

(e) The requirements in paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) shall become operative three months after the board adopts the regulations referenced in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b).

(f) This section shall become
 operative on January 1, 2006.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 8.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------

7165.

The requirements of this section may be substituted for the requirements of paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 7163 if a swimming pool contract is to be financed by a third-party lender and if all the following conditions are met:

(a) The lender has agreed, in writing, to provide financing to the buyer for the maximum estimated construction cost of the swimming pool. 

(b) The lender has provided the buyer a written copy of the terms and conditions of the loan for the maximum estimated construction cost of
 the swimming pool, including the following terms disclosed in the manner required by the federal Truth in Lending Act and Regulation Z: the annual percentage rate, the finance charge, the amount financed, the total number of payments, the payment schedule, and a description of the security interest to be taken by the lender. 

(c) The lender has agreed in writing to the following: 

(1) To offer to loan the maximum estimated construction cost on the terms and conditions disclosed pursuant to subdivision (b).

(2) If the construction cost of the swimming pool is determined after the completion of excavation to be less than the maximum estimated construction cost, to offer to loan the lesser amount needed to complete the construction of the swimming pool on the same security as, and at an annual percentage rate and
 monthly payment amount not to exceed, that disclosed in subdivision (b). 

The lender’s written agreement shall state the duration of the offer, which shall not be less than 15 days following the completion of the excavation of the swimming pool. 

(d) The buyer acknowledges receipt of the writings required by subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) and, no sooner than three business days after receiving all of these writings, requests on the form prescribed in subdivision (e) that the contractor begin performance of the swimming pool contract prior to the expiration of any rescission period applicable to the loan. 

(e) The request of a buyer, described in subdivision (d), shall be set forth on a document separate and apart from the swimming pool contract and shall contain the following notice in at least 10-point type unless otherwise stated:
 

“NOTICE

Under the law, this contract is not enforceable until: 

(1) A third party agrees to make a loan to finance the construction cost of the swimming pool; 

(2) You agree to accept the loan; and 

(3) You do not cancel the loan within the period prescribed for cancellation under the federal Truth in Lending Act or Regulation Z (usually three business days after the loan is consummated). 

Until the cancellation period is over, the contractor cannot deliver any materials or perform any services except preliminary services for which no mechanic’s lien can be claimed.

However, as an alternative to the above, you can ask the contractor
 to start work and deliver materials before the cancellation period on the loan is over if all of the following have occurred: 

(1) The lender has agreed, in writing, to provide you with financing for up to the maximum estimated construction cost of the swimming pool. 

(2) The lender has provided you with a written copy of the terms and conditions of a loan for the maximum estimated cost, including the annual percentage rate, the finance charge, the amount financed, the total of payments, the payment schedule, and a description of the security interest to be taken by the lender. 

(3) The lender has agreed in writing to offer these terms and conditions for a period not less than 15 days following completion of the excavation of the swimming pool. 

(4) Three business days have passed since you received the writing mentioned in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3), and you then sign a copy of this form to request that the contractor begin construction of the swimming pool before the cancellation period on your loan is over.

The first day you can sign the request for the contractor to begin construction of the swimming pool is .(contractor to insert third business day after buyer receives writings described in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c))If you sign this request, the contractor will be permitted to immediately begin performance of the
 contract, and if the contractor is not paid in accordance with the terms of the contract, he or she may file a lien against your property for the value of the labor and materials provided. [This paragraph shall be printed in 12-point type.]

REQUEST

I/we request that the contractor immediately start construction of the swimming pool. 
______ Date __________ Buyer(s)”

(f) The contractor shall provide the buyer a copy of the buyer’s signed request at the time of signature. 

(g) This section applies to each buyer who signs the swimming pool contract or the promissory note, other evidence of indebtedness, or security instrument incident to the loan for swimming pool construction. 

(h) For
 the purpose of this section, “business day” has the meaning provided in Section 9 of the Civil Code.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 7167.5 by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1160, Sec. 51.)
-------------------------------------------

7166.

The provisions of Article 10 shall not apply to contracts for the construction of swimming pools to be built for the use and enjoyment of other than a single-family unit upon or contiguous to premises occupied only by a single-family unit, nor shall they apply to the construction of swimming pools built as part of an original building plan by the same contractor who builds a single-family dwelling unit on the premises.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 7170 by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1160, Sec. 54.)
-------------------------------------------

7167.

(a) Any contract, the primary purpose of which is the construction of a swimming pool, that does not substantially comply with paragraph (4) or (5) of subdivision (c) or paragraph (7), (8), or (9) of subdivision (d) of Section 7159, shall be void and unenforceable by the contractor as contrary to public policy.

(b) Failure by the contractor to comply with paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 7159 as set forth in subdivision (a) of this section does not preclude the
 recovery of compensation for work performed based on quasi-contract, quantum meruit, restitution, or other similar legal or equitable remedies designed to prevent unjust enrichment.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 48, Sec. 21) by Stats. 2005, Ch. 385, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

7168.

In any action between a person contracting for construction of a swimming pool and a swimming pool contractor arising out of a contract for swimming pool construction, the court shall award reasonable attorney’s fees to the prevailing party.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 7169 by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1160, Sec. 53.)
-------------------------------------------

7169.

(a) The board, in collaboration with the Public Utilities Commission, shall develop and make available a “solar energy system disclosure document” or documents that provide a consumer, at a minimum, accurate, clear, and concise information regarding the installation of a solar energy system, total costs of installation, anticipated savings, the assumptions and inputs used to estimate the savings, and the implications of various financing options.

(b) On or before July 1, 2018, the board, in collaboration with the Public Utilities Commission, shall develop, and make available on its internet website the disclosure document described in subdivision (a) that a solar energy system
 company shall provide to a consumer prior to completion of a sale, financing, or lease of a solar energy system. The “solar energy system disclosure document” shall be printed on the front page or cover page of every solar energy contract. The “solar energy system disclosure document” shall be printed in boldface 16-point type and include the following types of primary information:

(1) The total cost and payments for the system, including financing costs.

(2) Information on how and to whom customers may provide complaints.

(3) The consumer’s right to the applicable cancellation period pursuant to Section 7159 of the Business and Professions Code.

(c) At
 the board’s discretion, other types of supporting information the board and the commission deem appropriate or useful in furthering the directive described in subdivision (a) may be included in the solar energy disclosure document following the front page or cover page, including, but not limited to:

(1) The amounts and sources of financing obtained.

(2) The calculations used by the home improvement salesperson to determine how many panels the homeowner needs to install.

(3) The calculations used by the home improvement salesperson to determine how much energy the panels will generate.

(4) Any additional monthly fees the homeowner’s electric company may bill, any
 turn-on charges, and any fees added for the use of an internet monitoring system of the panels or inverters.

(5) The terms and conditions of any guaranteed rebate.

(6) The final contract price, without the inclusion of possible rebates.

(7) The solar energy system company’s contractor’s license number.

(8) The impacts of solar energy system installations not performed to code.

(9) Types of solar energy system malfunctions.

(10) Information about the difference between a solar energy system lease and a solar energy system
 purchase.

(11) The impacts that the financing options, lease agreement terms, or contract terms will have on the sale of the consumer’s home, including any balloon payments or solar energy system relocation that may be required if the contract is not assigned to the new owner of the home.

(12) A calculator that calculates performance of solar projects to provide solar customers the solar power system’s projected output, which may include an expected performance-based buy-down calculator.

(d) A contract for sale, financing, or lease of a solar energy system and the solar energy system disclosure document shall be written in the same language as was principally used in the oral sales presentation made to the consumer or the
 print or digital marketing material given to the consumer.

(e) For solar energy systems utilizing Property Assessed Clean Energy (PACE) financing, the Financing Estimate and Disclosure form required by subdivision (b) of Section 5898.17 of the Streets and Highways Code shall satisfy the requirements of this section with respect to the financing contract only, but not, however, with respect to the underlying contract for installation of the solar energy system.

(f) The board shall post the PACE Financing Estimate and Disclosure form required by subdivision (b) of Section 5898.17 of the Streets and Highways Code on its internet website.

(g) For purposes of this section, “solar energy system” means a solar energy
 device to be installed on a residential building that has the primary purpose of providing for the collection and distribution of solar energy for the generation of electricity, that produces at least one kW, and not more than five MW, alternating current rated peak electricity, and that meets or exceeds the eligibility criteria established pursuant to Section 25782 of the Public Resources Code.

(h) This section does not apply to a solar energy system that is installed as a standard feature on new construction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 188, Sec. 11.   (SB 826)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7170.

(a) The Contractors State License Board shall receive and review complaints and consumer questions regarding solar energy systems companies and solar contractors. The board shall also receive complaints received from state agencies regarding solar energy systems companies and solar contractors.

(b) Beginning on July 1, 2019, the board annually shall compile a report documenting consumer complaints relating to solar contractors. The report shall be made available publicly on the board’s and the Public Utilities Commission’s internet websites. The report shall contain all of the following:

(1) The number and types of
 complaints.

(2) The ZIP Code where the consumer complaint originated.

(3) The disposition of all complaints received against a solar contractor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 249, Sec. 6.   (SB 757)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Asbestos Consultants [7180. - 7189.7.]

7180.

(a) No person shall, on or after July 1, 1992, engage in the practice of an asbestos consultant as defined in Section 7181, or as a site surveillance technician as defined in Section 7182, unless he or she is certified by the Division of Occupational Safety and Health pursuant to regulations required by subdivision (b) of Section 9021.5 of the Labor Code.

(b) Certification as an asbestos consultant or site surveillance technician shall not be required when a licensed contractor or registered asbestos abatement contractor takes no more than 12 bulk samples of suspected asbestos-containing material that is required to be removed, repaired, or disturbed as part of a construction project in a residential dwelling solely for any of the following purposes: (1) bid preparation for asbestos abatement; (2) evaluating exposure to its own employees during construction or asbestos abatement; or (3) determining for its own purposes or for the purpose of communicating whether or not a contract for asbestos abatement has been satisfactorily completed. Persons taking samples for the purposes described in this section shall be certified building inspectors under the Asbestos Hazard Emergency Response Act, as specified in Section 763 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations, appendix (c) to subpart (e). No licensed contractor or asbestos abatement contractor may provide professional health and safety services or perform any asbestos risk assessment. A bid for asbestos abatement may communicate the results and location of sampling for the presence of asbestos and how the asbestos will be abated. This section does not affect the requirement that asbestos abatement contractors be registered under Section 6501.5 of the Labor Code, nor does it permit a licensed contractor or asbestos abatement contractor to perform clearance air monitoring following asbestos abatement, unless otherwise permitted by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 526, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

7180.5.

When a building owner or operator engages the services of a person to perform asbestos consulting or site surveillance technician activities as defined in Sections 7181 and 7182 after July 1, 1992, the building owner or operator shall contract with a person who is certified by the Division of Occupational Safety and Health pursuant to the regulations required by subdivision (b) of Section 9021.5 of the Labor Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1255, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7181.

An “asbestos consultant,” as used in this chapter, means any person who contracts to provide professional health and safety services relating to asbestos-containing material, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 6501.8 of the Labor Code, including building inspections, abatement project design, contract administration, supervision of site surveillance technicians as defined in Section 7182, sample collections, preparation of asbestos management plans, and clearance air monitoring.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1255, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7182.

A “site surveillance technician” means any person who acts as an independent onsite representative of an asbestos consultant who monitors the asbestos abatement activities of others, provides asbestos air monitoring services for area and personnel samples, and performs building surveys and contract administration at the direction of an asbestos consultant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1255, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7183.

(a) Within 15 days of receipt of an application for certification pursuant to this article, the division shall inform the applicant in writing either (1) that the application is complete and accepted, or (2) that it is deficient and that additional information, documentation, or examination, specified in the notification, is required to complete the application. Within 45 days of the date of filing of a completed application, the division shall issue to each person who qualifies for certification pursuant to this article, a certification card which shall identify the holder thereof and the type of certification for which he or she has qualified. If the division cannot comply with the notification deadlines specified in this section, the division shall issue a provisional certification card until all procedures specified in this section are completed.

(b) The certification required by this article shall satisfy all certification requirements of the division for asbestos consultants and site surveillance technicians.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1255, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7183.5.

The division shall enforce this article. In the event the division determines that a certified asbestos consultant or site surveillance technician obtained certification under false pretenses, or that a certified asbestos consultant or site surveillance technician acted in a grossly negligent or fraudulent manner, or engaged in repeated acts of negligence, the division shall revoke that person’s certification. The division shall only revoke a certification after complying with all of the procedural requirements of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Division 3 of Part 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1255, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7184.

A person shall qualify as a certified asbestos consultant by meeting all of the following requirements:

(a) Having any one of the following:

(1) One year of asbestos-related experience, and a bachelor of science degree in engineering, architecture, industrial hygiene, construction management, or a related biological or physical science.

(2) Two years of asbestos-related experience, and a bachelor’s degree.

(3) Three years of asbestos-related experience, and an associate of arts degree in engineering, architecture, industrial hygiene, construction management, or a related biological or physical science.

(4) Four years of asbestos-related experience and a high school diploma or its equivalent.

(b) Possession of a valid federal Asbestos Hazard Emergency Response Act (Subchapter II (commencing with Section 2641) of Chapter 53 of Title 15 of the United States Code) certificate for the type of work being performed, or its equivalent, as determined by the division.

(c) Demonstration of proficiency by achieving a passing score as determined by the division on an examination approved or administered by the division including, but not limited to, the following subjects:

(1) Physical characteristics of asbestos.

(2) Health effects of asbestos.

(3) Federal Occupational Safety and Health Administration, Division of Occupational Safety and Health, Environmental Protection Agency, air quality management districts, and State Department of Health Services regulatory requirements, including protective clothing, respiratory protection, exposure limits, personal hygiene, medical monitoring, disposal, and general industry safety hazards.

(4) State-of-the-art asbestos abatement and control work procedures. The division shall define and incorporate into the certification standards the term “state-of-the-art” for purposes of this article, in the regulations required by subdivision (b) of Section 9021.5 of the Labor Code.

(5) Federal Asbestos Hazard Emergency Response Act training information and procedures for inspectors, management planners, and supervisors, as provided for under Subchapter II (commencing with Section 2641) of Chapter 53 of Title 15 of the United States Code, or the equivalent, as determined by the division.

(6) Information concerning industrial hygiene sampling methodology, including asbestos sampling and analysis techniques and recordkeeping.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1255, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7185.

A person shall qualify as a certified site surveillance technician by meeting all of the following requirements:

(a) Having six months of asbestos-related experience under the supervision of an asbestos consultant.

(b) Possession of a high school diploma or equivalent.

(c) Possession of a valid federal Asbestos Hazard Emergency Response Act (Subchapter II (commencing with Section 2641) of Chapter 53 of Title 15 of the United States Code) certificate for the type of work being performed, or its equivalent, as determined by the division.

(d) Demonstration of proficiency by achieving a passing score, as determined by the division, on an examination approved or administered by the division covering the following subjects:

(1) Physical characteristics of asbestos.

(2) Health effects of asbestos.

(3) Federal Occupational Safety and Health Administration, Division of Occupational Safety and Health, Environmental Protection Agency, air quality management districts, and State Department of Health Services regulatory requirements, including protective clothing, respiratory protection, exposure limits, personal hygiene, medical monitoring, and general industry safety hazards.

(4) State-of-the-art asbestos abatement and control work procedures.
